Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1738
Reports.

A credit union shall report to the department annually on or before the first day of February on forms supplied by the department for that purpose. The chairperson of the board of directors and the president of the credit union shall sign the report or reports certifying that such report or reports are correct according to their best knowledge and belief. The director may require additional reports as he or she deems appropriate and necessary. An additional fee of fifty dollars shall be levied for each day a credit union fails to provide a required report unless the delay is excused for cause.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 38;

Laws 1997, LB 137, § 11.